Wyoming, session 2026, HB0134.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 28-8-105 by creating a new subsection
(e) is amended to read:

28-8-105. Duties of director and staff; prefiling
bills; fiscal notes.
HB0134

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0291

(e) Upon request, the legislative service office
shall confirm whether the requestor's email communications
to a legislator were filtered by the legislature's email
system to a folder other than the legislator's inbox. If
the requestor's email communications were filtered to a
folder other than a legislator's inbox by the legislature's
email system, the person may request that the legislative
service office direct all current and future email
communications from the requestor's identified email
addresses to a legislator's inbox. The legislative service
office shall, after verification of the email addresses
ensure the requestor's current and future email
communications are directed to a legislator's inbox within
two (2) business days of receipt of the request unless the
delivery of the email communications pose an actual,
articulable security threat to the legislature's email
system. This subsection shall only apply to email
communications that were filtered by the legislature's
email system without intervention of the end-user through
spam, security or other system-wide filtering.

HB0134

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0291
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0134